District of Columbia statutes.
26-1401.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Affiliate” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(1).

(2)

“Appropriate federal financial institutions agency” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(2).

(3)

“Bank holding company” shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2(a) of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, approved May 9, 1956 (70 Stat. 133; 12 U.S.C. § 1841(a)).

(4)

“Capital” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(6).

(5)

“Capital accounts” means unimpaired capital stock, unimpaired surplus, and undivided profits or retained earnings of a financial institution.

(6)

“Capital stock” means the aggregate of shares of nonwithdrawable capital stock issued.

(7)

“Commissioner” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(7).

(8)

“Community Reinvestment Act” means the Community Reinvestment Act of 1977, approved October 12, 1977 (91 Stat. 1147; 12 U.S.C. § 2901 et. seq.).

(9)

“Department” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(9).

(10)

“Director” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(10).

(11)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(12)

“District of Columbia Banking Code” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.01(14).

(13)

“District savings institution” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(15).

(14)

“Equity securities” means a security representing an ownership interest in a corporation.or independent agency head

(15)

“Federal agency” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(17).

(16)

“Federal financial institutions agency” means a federal government agency with regulatory authority over a financial institution.

(17)

“Federally chartered savings institutions” means a financial institution chartered by the Office of Thrift Supervision, or a successor agency to the Office of Thrift Supervision.

(18)

“Financial institution” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(18).

(19)

“Investment securities” means commercial paper, banker’s acceptances, marketable securities in the form of bonds, notes, and debentures, and similar instruments that are regarded as investment securities.

(20)

“Loan” includes a line of credit or other extension of credit.

(21)

“Low-income” means an individual income that is less than 60% of the median individual income for the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area according to the statistics of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development or a median family income that is less than 60% of the median family income for the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area according to the statistics of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(22)

“Moderate-income” means an individual income that is at least 60%, and less than 80%, of the median individual income for the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area according to the statistics of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, or a median family income that is at least 60%, and less than 80%, of the median family income for the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area according to the statistics of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(23)

“National bank” means a financial institution chartered and supervised by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, or a successor agency to the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency.

(24)

“Person” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(21).

(25)

“Savings institution” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(23).

(26)

“State bank” means a bank chartered and supervised by a financial institutions agency of a state of the United States.

(27)

“State financial institutions agency” means a government agency of a state of the United States authorized to charter and supervise financial institutions.

(28)

“Subsidiary” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(24).

(29)

“Superior Court” means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(30)

“Universal bank” means a financial institution which is authorized by its articles of incorporation or other organizational documents to act as a financial institution and is certified under this chapter as a universal bank.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 202, 48 DCR 3244
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 2(e), 51 DCR 2817

Section References

This section is referenced in § 26-431.02 and § 26-831.02.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-166 rewrote pars. (7) and (9).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).